Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.365 and 2025 c 417 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person applying for a motor vehicle registration and paying the vehicle license fee required in RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e), (h), (j), (n), and (o) shall pay a motor vehicle weight fee in addition to all other fees and taxes required by law.For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after January 1, 2026, the motor vehicle weight fee:(a) Must be based on the motor vehicle scale weight or type as follows:WEIGHTFEEMotorcycle, of any scale weight$15.004,000 pounds$35.006,000 pounds$65.008,000 pounds$82.5016,000 pounds and over$96.00;(b) If the resultant motor vehicle scale weight is not listed in the table provided in (a) of this subsection, must be increased to the next highest weight; and(c) Must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.(2) A person applying for a motor home vehicle registration shall, in lieu of the motor vehicle weight fee required in subsection (1) of this section, pay a motor home vehicle weight fee of $75 in addition to all other fees and taxes required by law. The motor home vehicle weight fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.(3) The department shall:(a) Rely on motor vehicle empty scale weights provided by vehicle manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to determine the weight of each motor vehicle; and(b) Adopt rules for determining weight for vehicles without manufacturer empty scale weights.Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.365 and 2025 c 417 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person applying for a motor vehicle registration and paying the vehicle license fee required in RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e), (h), (j), (n), and (o) shall pay a motor vehicle weight fee in addition to all other fees and taxes required by law.For vehicle registrations that are due or become due on or after January 1, 2029, the motor vehicle weight fee:(a) Must be based on the motor vehicle scale weight or type as follows:WEIGHTFEEMotorcycle, of any scale weight$15.004,000 pounds$35.006,000 pounds$75.008,000 pounds$90.0016,000 pounds and over$110.00;(b) If the resultant motor vehicle scale weight is not listed in the table provided in (a) of this subsection, must be increased to the next highest weight; and(c) Must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.(2) A person applying for a motor home vehicle registration shall, in lieu of the motor vehicle weight fee required in subsection (1) of this section, pay a motor home vehicle weight fee of $75 in addition to all other fees and taxes required by law. The motor home vehicle weight fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.415.(3) The department shall:(a) Rely on motor vehicle empty scale weights provided by vehicle manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to determine the weight of each motor vehicle; and(b) Adopt rules for determining weight for vehicles without manufacturer empty scale weights.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Section 1 of this act expires January 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2029.--- END ---